Wisconsin, session 2025, AB109.
do enact as follows:Joint Legislative Council prefatory note: This bill was prepared for the Joint Legislative Council’s Special Committee on State-Tribal Relations.Under current law, an individual who holds any provisional teaching license is eligible for a tier III lifetime license upon successfully completing six semesters of teaching experience. This bill provides an option for a federally recognized American Indian tribe or band to decide whether each applicant for a lifetime license to teach the American Indian language associated with the tribe or band in an American Indian language program is qualified to receive the lifetime license. To exercise this option, an American Indian tribe or band must notify the Department of Public Instruction in writing. If an American Indian tribe or band exercises this option, DPI may not issue a lifetime license to teach the associated American Indian language to an individual unless the tribe or band notifies the department that it has determined that the individual is qualified for a lifetime license to teach the American Indian language in an American Indian language program.Under this bill, if an American Indian tribe or band opts to review individual applicants for a lifetime license, DPI must notify the tribal government whenever an individual applies for a tier III lifetime license in the language that is associated with the tribal government. Upon receiving the notice from DPI, the tribal government must determine whether the applicant is highly skilled in the language, and notify the department of one of the following:1. If the associated tribal government determines that the individual is highly skilled in the language, that the tribal government endorses the individual for a tier III lifetime license in the language.2. If the associated tribal government determines that the individual is not highly skilled in the language, that the tribal government does not endorse the individual for a tier III lifetime license in the language but does endorse the individual to renew a tier II license in the language.The bill also provides that DPI may grant a tier III lifetime license in an American Indian language only if the applicant satisfies certain other requirements needed for a tier III lifetime license and is endorsed for the tier III lifetime license by the tribal government associated with that language.AB109,11Section 1. 118.19 (18) (bg) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB109,2,62118.19 (18) (bg) 1. The Except as provided in par. (bp), the department may 3issue a lifetime license under this subdivision to an individual who obtained a 4provisional license under par. (a) or (bc) if the individual has successfully completed 56 semesters of teaching, administrating, or pupil services experience, as defined by 6the department by rule.AB109,27Section 2. 118.19 (18) (bp) of the statutes is created to read:AB109,3,98118.19 (18) (bp) Beginning on the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB 9inserts date], the department may not issue to an individual a lifetime license that 10authorizes the individual to teach an American Indian language in an American 11Indian language program if the federally recognized American Indian tribe or band 12in this state that is associated with the American Indian language submits to the 1department written notice that states that the tribe or band wishes to evaluate 2each individual who applies for a lifetime license to teach the American Indian 3language in an American Indian language program. If a federally recognized 4American Indian tribe or band in this state submits a written notice to the 5department under this paragraph, the department may issue a lifetime license to 6an individual to teach an American Indian language in an American Indian 7language program only if the tribe or band notifies the department that it has 8determined that the individual is qualified for a lifetime license to teach the 9American Indian language in an American Indian language program.AB109,310Section 3. PI 34.055 (3) of the administrative code is created to read:AB109,3,1511PI 34.055 (3) Lifetime license; optional approval process. (a) If a tribal 12government associated with a language under sub. (1) submits a notice to the 13department under s. 118.19 (18) (bp), Stats., the department shall notify the tribal 14government whenever an individual applies for a tier III lifetime license in the 15language under sub. (1) that is associated with the tribal government.AB109,3,1816(b) If a tribal government receives notice under par. (a), the tribal government 17shall determine whether the applicant is highly skilled in the language under sub. 18(1), and notify the department of one of the following:AB109,3,21191. If the associated tribal government determines that the individual is highly 20skilled in the language under sub. (1), that the tribal government endorses the 21individual for a tier III lifetime license in the language.AB109,4,2222. If the associated tribal government determines that the individual is not 23highly skilled in the language under sub. (1), that the tribal government does not 1endorse the individual for a tier III lifetime license in the language but does endorse 2the individual to renew a tier II license in the language under s. PI 34.040.AB109,4,63(c) The department may grant a tier III lifetime license in a language under 4sub. (1) only if the applicant satisfies the requirements under s. PI 34.041 (3) (a) to 5(c) and is endorsed under par. (b) 1. for the tier III lifetime license by the tribal 6government associated with that language.AB109,4,77